cji.adj.lexicon.lexd
щад[a-pref,o-suff]  # одинаковый
щайт1ан[no_pref,o-suff]  # хитроумный
щак[no_pref,o-suff]  # подозрительный
ъин[i-pref,o-suff]  # плодородный, жирный
эгъвар[no_pref,o-suff]  # мутный
эд[no_pref,u-suff]  # некоторый
эк1[no_pref,u-suff]  # лишний
эркен[no_pref,o-suff]  # просторный, вольный, привольный
эх[no_pref,u-suff]  # полый
эч1ац1ал1[no_pref,o-suff]  # двадцатый
эч1л1[no_pref,o-suff]  # второй
эш[no_pref,u-suff]  # плохой
эъ[no_pref,u-suff]  # красный, румяный
